Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 9.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-608
Dogs in counties having a population of 80,000 inhabitants or more;
responsibilities of owners.

In counties having a population
of eighty thousand or more inhabitants and cities of the first class contained
in such counties, it shall be unlawful for any person, firm, partnership,
limited liability company, or corporation to have any dog which is owned,
kept, harbored, or allowed to be habitually in or upon premises occupied by
him, her, or it or under his, her, or its control to be at large.

Laws
1961, c. 268, § 2, p. 787;

Laws 1988, LB 630, § 1;

Laws 2008, LB1055, § 9.